sv: Detaljer för kamera: Justerbar ISO; Justerbar öppning; Justerbar slutartid; Antireflex; Ledbar skärm; Inbyggd blixt; Inbyggda högtalare; Digital zoom; Ansiktsigenkänning; Fryssäker; Hot shoe mount; Bildstabilisering; Utbytbar lins; LED-bakgrundsbelysning; Lättvikt; Fjärrkontroll; Självutlösare; Stötsäker; Slow motion-läge; Time lapse-läge; Timer; Pekskärm; Viewfinder; Vattensäker; Annat
ko: 카메라 기능: 조절식 ISO; 조절식 조리개; 조절식 셔터 속도; 반사 방지; 관절형 스크린; 내장 플래시; 내장 스피커; 디지털 줌; 얼굴 인식; 동결 방지; 핫 슈 마운트; 이미지 안정화; 교체 가능 렌즈; LED 백라이트; 경량; 원격 제어; 셀프 타이머; 충격 방지; 슬로우 모션 모드; 타임랩스 모드; 시간제 노동자; 터치스크린; 뷰파인더; 방수; 기타
pl: Charakterystyka kamery: Regulowana ISO; Regulowana przysłona; Regulowany czas otwarcia migawki; Antyrefleksyjny; Ekran przegubowy; Wbudowana lampa błyskowa; Wbudowane głośniki; Zoom cyfrowy; Wykrywanie twarzy; Odporny na zamarzanie; Mocowanie gorącej stopki; Stabilizator obrazu; Wymienna soczewka; Podświetlenie LED; Lekkie; Zdalne sterowanie; Samowyzwalacz; Wstrząsoodporny; Tryb wolnego ruchu; Tryb upływu czasu; Timer; Ekran dotykowy; Wizjer; Wodoszczelny; Pozostałe
hu: Kamera jellemzői: Állítható ISO-érzékenység; Állítható rekesznyílás; Állítható záridő; Tükröződésmentes; Kihajtható kijelző; Beépített vaku; Beépített hangszórók; Digitális zoom; Arcfelismerés; Lefagyásbiztos; Vakupapucs; Képstabilizálás; Cserélhető objektív; LED háttérvilágítás; Könnyű; Távvezérlés; Önkioldó; Ütésálló; Slow motion mód; Time lapse mód; Időzítő; Érintőképernyő; Kereső; Vízálló; Egyéb
bg-BG: Функции на камерата: Регулируем ISO; Регулируема бленда; Регулируема скорост на затвора; Антирефлексна защита; Шарнирен екран; Вградена светкавица; Вградени високоговорители; Цифрово увеличение; Разпознаване на лица; Устойчив на замръзване; Монтаж на Hot shoe; Стабилизиране на изображението; Сменяем обектив; LED подсветка; Олекотена; Дистанционно управление; Самоснимачка; Удароустойчива; Режим на забавено движение; Таймлапс режим; Таймер; Сензорен екран; Визьор; Водоустойчив; Други
sk-SK: Funkcie fotoaparátu: Nastaviteľné ISO; Nastaviteľná clona; Nastaviteľná rýchlosť uzávierky; Antireflexný; Kĺbová obrazovka; Vstavaný blesk; Vstavané reproduktory; Digitálny zoom; Detekcia tváre; Mrazuvzdorný; Sánky na pripevnenie príslušenstva; Stabilizácia obrazu; Vymeniteľný objektív; LED podsvietenie; Ľahký; Diaľkové ovládanie; Samospúšť; Nárazuvzdorný; Režim spomaleného pohybu; Časozberný režim; Časovač; Dotykový displej; Hľadáčik; Vodotesný; Iné
pt-BR: Recursos da câmera: ISO ajustável; Abertura ajustável; Velocidade do obturador ajustável; Antirreflexo; Tela articulada; Flash integrado; Alto-falantes integrados; Zoom digital; Detecção facial; À prova de congelamento; Montagem de sapata; Estabilização de imagem; Lentes intercambiáveis; Retroiluminação LED; Leve; Controle remoto; Temporizador automático; À prova de choque; Modo câmera lenta; Modo de timelapse; Cronômetro; Tela sensível ao toque; Visor; À prova d'água; Outro
cs: Vlastnosti kamery: Nastavitelné ISO; Nastavitelný otvor; Nastavitelná rychlost závěrky; Antireflexní; Kloubová obrazovka; Integrovaný blesk; Vestavěné reproduktory; Digitální zoom; Detekce obličeje; Mrazuvzdorné; Uchycení na horkou patku; Stabilizace obrazu; Vyměnitelný objektiv; LED podsvícení; Lehké; Dálkové ovládání; Samospoušť; Nárazuvzdorný; Režim zpomaleného pohybu; Časosběrný režim; Časovač; Dotyková obrazovka; Hledáček; Voděodolný; Jiné
hr-HR: Značajke fotoaparata/kamere: Podesivi ISO; Podesivi otvor blende; Podesiva brzina zatvarača; Nereflektirajući; Zglobni zaslon; Ugrađena bljeskalica; Ugrađeni zvučnici; Digitalno zumiranje; Prepoznavanje lica; Otporno na smrzavanje; Hot shoe nosač; Stabilizacija slike; Zamjenjivi objektiv; LED pozadinsko osvjetljenje; Lagana; Upravljanje na daljinu; Samookidač; Otporno na udarce; Način rada za usporeno snimanje; Način rada za ubrzano snimanje; Brojač vremena; Zaslon osjetljiv na dodir; Tražilo; Vodootporna; Ostalo
pt-PT: Características da câmara: ISO ajustável; Abertura ajustável; Velocidade do obturador ajustável; Antirreflexo; Ecrã articulado; Flash integrado; Altifalantes integrados; Zoom digital; Deteção facial; À prova de congelamento; Suporte de montagem de sapata; Estabilização de imagem; Lente intercambiável; Retroiluminação LED; Leveza; Controlo remoto; Autotemporizador; À prova de choque; Modo câmara lenta; Modo de lapso de tempo; Temporizador; Ecrã tátil; Viewfinder; Impermeável; Outro
fr: Caractéristiques de l’appareil photo: Sensibilité ISO réglable; Ouverture réglable; Vitesse d’obturation réglable; Anti-réfléchissant; Écran orientable; Flash intégré; Enceintes intégrées; Zoom numérique; Détection des visages; Résistant au gel; Porte-accessoire sabot; Stabilisation d’image; Objectif interchangeable; Rétro-éclairage LED; Léger; Télécommande; Retardateur; Antichocs; Mode ralenti; Mode TimeLapse; Minuterie; Écran tactile; Viseur; Imperméable; Autre
en: Camera features: Adjustable ISO; Adjustable aperture; Adjustable shutter speed; Anti-reflective; Articulating screen; Built-in flash; Built-in speakers; Digital zoom; Face detection; Freezeproof; Hot shoe mount; Image stabilization; Interchangeable lens; LED backlight; Lightweight; Remote control; Self-timer; Shockproof; Slow motion mode; Time lapse mode; Timer; Touchscreen; Viewfinder; Waterproof; Other
sl-SI: Lastnosti fotoaparata: Nastavljiv ISO; Nastavljiva zaslonka; Nastavljiva hitrost zaklopa; Protiodsevno; Zgibni zaslon; Vgrajena bliskavica; Vgrajeni zvočniki; Digitalna povečava; Zaznavanje obrazov; Odporen proti zmrzovanju; Nastavek za doddatno opremo; Stabilizacija slike; Izmenljiva leča; LED osvetlitev ozadja; Lahka; Daljinsko upravljanje; Samosprožilec; Odporno na udarce; Način počasnega posnetka; Način časovnega zamika; Časovnik; Zaslon na dotik; Iskalo; Vodoodporen; Drugo
zh-TW: 相機功能: ISO 可調; 光圈可調; 快門速度可調; 防反光; 鉸接螢幕; 內建閃光燈; 內建揚聲器; 數位變焦; 人臉偵測; 防凍; 熱靴座; 影像穩定; 可更換鏡頭; LED 背光; 輕盈; 遠端控制; 自拍定時器; 防震; 慢動作模式; 縮時模式; 計時器; 觸控螢幕; 取景器; 防水; 其他
vi: Vật liệu ống kính máy ảnh: Điều chỉnh được ISO; Điều chỉnh được khẩu độ; Có thể điều chỉnh tốc độ màn trập; Chống phản chiếu; Màn hình có khớp nối; Có đèn flash; Loa tích hợp; Thu phóng kỹ thuật số; Phát hiện khuôn mặt; Chống sự đóng băng; Đế kết nối nhanh; Chống rung hình ảnh; Ống kính đổi lẫn được; Đèn nền LED; Hạng nhẹ; Điều khiển từ xa; Tự hẹn giờ; Chống sốc; Chế độ chuyển động chậm; Chế độ tua nhanh thời gian; Hẹn giờ; Màn hình cảm ứng; Kính ngắm; Chống thấm nước; Khác
tr: Kamera özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir ISO; Ayarlanabilir açıklık; Ayarlanabilir deklanşör hızı; Yansıma önleyici; Eklemli ekran; Dahili flaş; Dahili hoparlörler; Dijital yakınlaştırma; Yüz tanıma; Donma yapmaz; Sıcak yuva bağlantısı; Görüntü stabilizasyonu; Değiştirilebilir lens; LED arka ışık; Hafif; Uzaktan kumanda; Otomatik zamanlayıcı; Darbeye dayanıklı; Ağır çekim modu; Hızlandırılmış çekim modu; Zamanlayıcı; Dokunmatik ekran; Vizör; Su geçirmez; Diğer
nl: Kenmerken camera: Verstelbare ISO-waarde; Verstelbaar diafragma; Instelbare sluitertijd; Anti-reflecterend; Scharnierend scherm; Ingebouwde flits; Ingebouwde luidsprekers; Digitale zoom; Gezichtsherkenning; Vorstbestendig; Bevestiging op flitsschoen; Beeldstabilisatie; Verwisselbare lens; Led-achtergrondverlichting; Lichtgewicht; Afstandsbediening; Zelfontspanner; Schokbestendig; Slow motion-modus; Tijdspannemodus; Timer; Touchscreen; Zoeker; Waterdicht; Andere
th: คุณลักษณะของกล้อง: ปรับ ISO ได้; รูรับแสงแบบปรับได้; ปรับความไวชัตเตอร์ได้; ป้องกันแสงสะท้อน; หน้าจอแบบประกบ; มีแฟลชในตัว; มีลำโพงในตัว; การซูมแบบดิจิทัล; การตรวจจับใบหน้า; ป้องกันอากาศเย็น; ที่ยึดฐานเสียบแฟลช; ระบบป้องกันภาพสั่นไหว; เปลี่ยนเลนส์ได้; ไฟแบ็คไลท์ LED; น้ำหนักเบา; รีโมตควบคุม; มีตัวจับเวลาในเครื่อง; กันกระแทก; โหมดสโลว์โมชัน; โหมดไทม์แลปส์; ตัวจับเวลา; แบบทัชสกรีน; Viewfinder; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ja: カメラの機能: ISO調整可能; 絞り調節可能; 調節可能なシャッタースピード; 反射防止; 連動スクリーン; フラッシュ内蔵; 内蔵スピーカー; デジタルズーム; 顔検出; 凍結防止; ホットシューマウント; 手ブレ補正; 交換可能なレンズ; LEDバックライト; 軽量; リモコン; セルフタイマー; 耐衝撃; スローモーションモード; タイムラプスモード; タイマー; タッチスクリーン; ファインダー; 防水; その他
de: Kamerafunktionen: Einstellbare ISO; Einstellbare Blende; Einstellbare Verschlusszeit; Antireflex; Schwenkbares Display; Eingebautes Blitzlicht; Integrierte Lautsprecher; Digitaler Zoom; Gesichtserkennung; Frostsicher; Zubehörschuhbefestigung; Bildstabilisierung; Wechselobjektiv; LED-Hintergrundbeleuchtung; Leicht; Fernsteuerung; Selbstauslöser; Stoßfest; Zeitlupen-Modus; Zeitraffermodus; Timer; Touchscreen; Sucher; Wasserdicht; Sonstiges
nb: Kamerafunksjoner: Regulerbar ISO; Justerbar blenderåpning; Regulerbar lukkerhastighet; Antirefleks; Artikulerende skjerm; Innebygd blitz; Innebygde høyttalere; Digital zoom; Ansiktsgjenkjennelse; Frysebestandig; Hot shoe-feste; Bildestabilisering; Utskiftbare objektiver; LED-bakgrunnsbelysning; Lett; Fjernkontroll; Selvutløser; Støtsikker; Saktefilm-modus; TimeLapse-modus; Tidtaker; Berøringsskjerm; Visningssøker; Vannsikker; Annen
es: Características de la cámara: ISO regulable; Apertura regulable; Velocidad de obturación regulable; Antirreflectante; Pantalla articulada; Flash incorporado; Altavoces incorporados; Zoom digital; Detección de rostro; A prueba de congelación; Montaje de zapata; Estabilización de imagen; Objetivo intercambiable; Retroiluminación LED; Liviano; Control remoto; Disparador automático; A prueba de golpes; Modo de cámara lenta; Modo lapso de tiempo; Temporizador; Pantalla táctil; Visor; Impermeable; Otros
ru: Характеристики камеры: Регулируемый ISO; Регулируемая диафрагма; Регулируемая скорость затвора; Антибликовый; Поворачивающийся экран; Встроенная вспышка; Встроенные динамики; Цифровой зум; Распознавание лиц; Морозостойкий; Крепление «горячий башмак»; Стабилизация изображения; Сменный объектив; Светодиодная подсветка; Легкий; Дистанционное управление; Автоспуск; Ударопрочный; Режим замедленной съемки; Режим покадровой съемки; Таймер; Сенсорный экран; Видоискатель; Водонепроницаемый; Другое
zh-CN: 相机功能: 可调 ISO; 可调光圈; 可调快门速度; 防反光; 铰接屏幕; 内置闪光灯; 内置扬声器; 数字变焦; 人脸检测; 防冻; 热靴座; 图像稳定; 可互换镜头; LED 背光源; 轻质; 远程控制; 自拍; 防震; 慢动作模式; 延时拍摄模式; 定时器; 触摸屏; 取景器; 防水; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά κάμερας: Ρυθμιζόμενο ISO; Ρυθμιζόμενο διάφραγμα; Ρυθμιζόμενη ταχύτητα κλείστρου; Αντιανακλαστική; Αρθρωτή οθόνη; Ενσωματωμένο φλας; Ενσωματωμένα ηχεία; Ψηφιακό ζουμ; Ανίχνευση προσώπου; Ανθεκτική σε χαμηλές θερμοκρασίες; Βάση για hot shoe; Σταθεροποίηση εικόνας; Εναλλάξιμος φακός; Οπίσθιος φωτισμός LED; Μικρού βάρους; Τηλεχειρισμός; Αυτόματο χρονόμετρο; Αντικραδασμικό; Λειτουργία αργής κίνησης; Λειτουργία time lapse; Χρονόμετρο; Οθόνη αφής; Σκόπευτρο; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
fi: Kameran ominaisuudet: Säädettävä ISO; Säädettävä aukko; Säädettävä suljinaika; Heijastamaton; Liikkuva näyttö; Sisäänrakennettu salama; Sisäänrakennetut kaiuttimet; Digitaalinen zoomi; Kasvojentunnistus; Pakkasen kestävä; Salamakenkä; Kuvanvakain; Vaihdettava linssi; LED-taustavalo; Kevyt; Kauko-ohjain; Itselaukaisin; Iskunkestävä; Hidastettu tila; Aikaviivetila; Ajastin; Kosketusnäyttö; Etsin; Vedenkestävä; Muu
lt-LT: Fotoaparato ypatybės: Reguliuojamas ISO; Reguliuojama diafragma; Reguliuojamas išlaikymas; Neatspindintis šviesos; Reguliuojamas ekranas; Integruota blykstė; Integruoti garsiakalbiai; Skaitmeninis priartinimas; Veido aptikimas; Neužstringanti; Fotoaparato laikiklis; Vaizdo stabilizavimas; Keičiamas objektyvas; LED foninis apšvietimas; Lengvas; Nuotolinis valdymas; Integruotas laikmatis; Atsparus smūgiams; Sulėtinto kadro režimas; „Time lapse“ režimas; Laikmatis; Jutiklinis ekranas; Vaizdo ieškiklis; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
da: Kamerafunktioner: Justerbar ISO; Justerbar blænde; Justerbar lukkertid; Anti-reflekterende; Artikulerende skærm; Indbygget blitz; Indbyggede højtalere; Digital zoom; Ansigtsgenkendelse; Frostsikker; Hot shoe-montering; Billedstabilisering; Udskifteligt objektiv; LED-baggrundsbelysning; Letvægts; Fjernbetjening; Selvudløser; Stødsikker; Slowmotion-tilstand; Time-lapse-tilstand; Timer; Touchskærm; Viewfinder; Vandtæt; Andet
it: Funzionalità della fotocamera: ISO variabile; Apertura regolabile; Velocità dell'otturatore regolabile; Antiriflesso; Display articolato; Flash incorporato; Altoparlanti integrati; Zoom digitale; Riconoscimento facciale; Antigelo; Supporto per slitta a contatto caldo; Stabilizzazione dell'immagine; Lenti intercambiabili; Retroilluminazione LED; Leggero; Telecomando; Autoscatto; Antiurto; Modalità rallentatore; Modalità time-lapse; Timer; Touchscreen; Viewfinder; Impermeabile; Altro
ro-RO: Caracteristici aparat foto: ISO reglabil; Diafragmă reglabilă; Viteză de expunere reglabilă; Anti-reflexii; Ecran articulat; Bliț încorporat; Difuzoare încorporate; Zoom digital; Detectarea feței; Rezistență la îngheț; Suport hot shoe; Stabilizarea imaginii; Obiective interschimbabile; Iluminare de fundal cu LED; Ușoară; Telecomandă; Autodeclanșator; Rezistență la șocuri; Modul de mișcare lentă; Modul time lapse; Cronometru; Ecran tactil; Vizor; Impermeabilitate; Altele